California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(b) Up to 50 percent of the moneys provided pursuant to subdivision (a) may be used by counties to pay for new contracts, with an effective date no earlier than July 1989, with private physicians for provision of emergency, obstetric, and
 pediatric services in facilities which are not owned or operated by a county, and where access to those services has been severely restricted. The contracts may provide for partial or full reimbursement for physician services provided to patients described in subdivision (f) of Section 16952, and shall be subject to subdivision (d) of Section 16955.

(c) At least 50 percent of the moneys provided pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be transferred to the county Physician Services Account established in accordance with Section 16952 and administered in accordance with Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 16951).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 51, Sec. 37.   Effective April 18, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

16950.1.

The twenty-four million nine hundred fifteen thousand dollars ($24,915,000) appropriated by Chapter 1331 of the Statutes of 1989 and the act amending this section in the 1990 portion of the 1989–90 Regular Session of the Legislature, to be allocated to counties for uncompensated physician services shall be allocated to MISP counties in accordance with percentages established in Section 16941. These funds shall be administered in accordance with subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 16950.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 50, Sec. 21.   Effective April 18, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Physician Services Account [16951. - 16959.]

16951.

As a condition of receiving funds pursuant to this chapter, each county shall establish an emergency medical services fund as authorized by subdivision (a) of Section 1797.98 of the Health and Safety Code. This section shall not be interpreted to require any county to impose the assessment authorized by Section 1465 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1331, Sec. 9.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

16952.

(a) (1) Each county shall establish within its emergency medical services fund a Physician Services Account. Each county shall deposit in the Physician Services Account those funds appropriated by the Legislature for the purposes of the Physician Services Account of the fund.

(2) (A) Each county may encumber sufficient funds to reimburse physician losses incurred during the fiscal year for which bills will not be received until after
 the fiscal year.

(B) Each county shall provide a reasonable basis for its estimate of the necessary amount encumbered.

(C) All funds that are encumbered for a fiscal year shall be expended or disencumbered prior to the submission of the report of actual expenditures required by Sections 16938 and 16980.

(b) (1) Funds deposited in the Physician Services Account in the county emergency medical services fund shall be exempt from the percentage allocations set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 1797.98. However, funds in the county Physician Services Account shall not be used to reimburse for physician services provided by physicians employed by county hospitals.

(2) No physician who provides physician services in a primary care
 clinic which receives funds from this act shall be eligible for reimbursement from the Physician Services Account for any losses incurred in the provision of those services.

(c) The county physician services account shall be administered by each county, except that a county that is eligible to participate in the CMSP pursuant to Section 16809, may elect to have its county physician services account administered by the state.

(d) Costs of administering the account, whether by the county or by the department through the emergency medical services contract-back program, shall be reimbursed by the account based on actual administrative costs, not to exceed 10 percent of the amount of the account.

(e) For purposes of this article “administering agency” means the agency designated by the board of supervisors to administer
 this article, or the department, in the case of those counties that are eligible to participate in the CMSP pursuant to Section 16809, and that elect to have the state administer this article on their behalf.

(f) The county Physician Services Account shall be used to reimburse physicians for losses incurred for services provided during the fiscal year of allocation due to patients who do not have health insurance coverage for emergency services and care, who cannot afford to pay for those services, and for whom payment will not be made through any private coverage or by any program funded in whole or in part by the federal government with the exception of claims submitted for reimbursement through Section 1011 of the federal Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement and Modernization Act of 2003.

(g) Physicians shall be eligible to receive payment for patient care services provided
 by, or in conjunction with, a properly credentialed nurse practitioner or physician’s assistant for care rendered under the direct supervision of a physician and surgeon who is present in the facility where the patient is being treated and who is available for immediate consultation. Payment shall be limited to those claims that are substantiated by a medical record and that have been reviewed and countersigned by the supervising physician and surgeon in accordance with regulations established for the supervision of nurse practitioners and physician assistants in California.

(h) (1) Reimbursement for losses shall be limited to emergency services as defined in Section 16953, obstetric, and pediatric services as defined in Sections 16905.5 and 16907.5, respectively.

(2) It is the intent of this subdivision to allow reimbursement for all of the following:

(A) All inpatient and outpatient obstetric services which are medically necessary, as determined by the attending physician.

(B) All inpatient and outpatient pediatric services which are medically necessary, as determined by the attending physician.

(i) Any physician may be reimbursed for up to 50 percent of the amount claimed pursuant to Section 16955 for the initial cycle of reimbursements made by the administering agency in a given year. All funds remaining at the end of the fiscal year shall be distributed proportionally, based on the dollar amount of claims submitted and paid to all physicians who submitted qualifying claims during that year. The administering agency shall not disburse funds in excess of the total amount of a qualified claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 577, Sec. 26.   Effective October 13, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

16952.1.

(a) Each county that elects to establish a Physicians Services Account in the county emergency medical services fund shall annually, on April 15, report to the Legislature on the implementation and status of the Physicians Services Account. The report shall cover the preceding fiscal year, and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The total amount of moneys deposited in the Physicians Services Account.

(2) The account balance and the amount of moneys disbursed to physicians and surgeons.

(3) The number of claims paid to physicians, and the percentage of claims paid, based on the uniform fee schedule, as adopted by the county.

(4) The amount of moneys available to be disbursed to physicians, descriptions of the physician claims payment methodologies, the dollar amount of the total allowable claims submitted, and the percentage at which those claims are reimbursed.

(5) A statement of the policies, procedures, and regulatory action taken to implement and run the program under this chapter.

(6) The name of the physician and hospital administrator organization, or names of specified physicians and
 hospital administrators, contracted to review claims payment methodologies.

(b) Each county shall make available to any member of the public, upon request, the report required under subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 671, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

16952.5.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (g) of Section 16952, expenses incurred by Solano County for the development of managed care systems to increase access for indigents to physician emergency services shall be reimbursed subject to the availability of unexpended 1990–91 and 1991–92 fiscal year funds, up to a maximum of four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000).

(b) The county shall consult with the local medical society before seeking reimbursement pursuant to this
 subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 105, Sec. 1.   Effective July 13, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

16953.

(a) For purposes of this chapter “emergency services” means physician services in one of the following:

(1) A general acute care hospital which provides basic or comprehensive emergency services for emergency medical conditions.

(2) A site which was approved by a county prior to January 1, 1990, as a paramedic receiving station for the treatment of emergency patients, for emergency medical conditions.

(3) Beginning in the 1991–92 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, in a facility which contracted prior to January 1, 1990, with the National Park Service to provide emergency medical services, for emergency medical conditions.

(4) A standby emergency room in a hospital specified in Section 124840 of the Health and Safety Code, for emergency medical conditions.

(5) A standby emergency room in a hospital in existence on January 1, 2007, located in Los Angeles County that meets all of the following requirements:

(A) The requirements of subdivision (m) of Section 70413 and Sections 70415 and 70417 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) Reported at least 18,000 emergency
 department patient encounters to the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development in 2007 and continues to report at least 18,000 emergency department patient encounters to the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development in each year thereafter.

(C) A hospital with a standby emergency department meeting the requirements of this paragraph shall do both of the following:

(i) Annually provide the State Department of Public Health and the local emergency medical services agency with certification that it meets the requirements of subparagraph (A). The department shall confirm the hospital’s compliance with subparagraph (A).

(ii) Annually provide to the State Department of Public Health and the local emergency medical services agency the emergency department patient encounters it reports to the Office of
 Statewide Health Planning and Development to establish that it meets the requirement of subparagraph (B).

(b) For purposes of this chapter, “emergency medical condition” means a medical condition manifesting itself by acute symptoms of sufficient severity, including severe pain, which in the absence of immediate medical attention could reasonably be expected to result in any of the following:

(1) Placing the patient’s health in serious jeopardy.

(2) Serious impairment to bodily functions.

(3) Serious dysfunction to any bodily organ or part.

(c) It is the intent of this section to allow reimbursement for all inpatient and outpatient services which are necessary for the treatment of an
 emergency medical condition as certified by the attending physician or other appropriate provider.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 288, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

16953.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an emergency physician and surgeon, or an emergency physician group, with a gross billings arrangement with a hospital shall be entitled to receive reimbursement from the physician services account in the county’s emergency medical services fund for services provided in that hospital, if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The services are provided in a basic or comprehensive general acute care hospital emergency department. 

(b) The physician and surgeon is not an employee of the hospital. 

(c) All provisions of Section 16955 are satisfied, except that payment to the emergency physician and surgeon, or an emergency physician group, by a hospital pursuant to a gross billings arrangement shall not be interpreted to mean that payment for a patient is made by a responsible third party. 

(d) Reimbursement from the physician services account in the county’s emergency medical services fund is sought by the hospital or the hospital’s designee, as the billing and collection agent for the emergency physician and surgeon, or an emergency physician group. 

(e) For purposes of this section, “gross billings arrangement” means an arrangement whereby a hospital serves as the billing and
 collection agent for the emergency physician and surgeon, or an emergency physician group, and pays the emergency physician and surgeon, or an emergency physician group, a percentage of the emergency physician and surgeon’s or group’s gross billings for all patients.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 278, Sec. 20.   Effective July 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

16953.2.

Nothing in this article shall prevent a physician from utilizing an agent who furnishes billing and collection services to the physician to submit claims or receive payment for claims.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 278, Sec. 21.   Effective July 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

16953.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other restrictions on reimbursement, a county shall adopt a fee schedule to establish a uniform, reasonable level of reimbursement from the Physician Services Account for reimbursable services.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other restrictions on reimbursement, the State Department of Public Health shall adopt a single fee schedule to establish a uniform, reasonable level of reimbursement for use in the physician services
 reimbursement programs operated by the department pursuant to contract, as provided for in subdivision (c) of Section 16952.

(2) The State Department of Public Health may develop, contract for the development of, or adopt by reference, the fee schedule required by paragraph (1).

(3) Pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 16952, the State Department of Public Health may be reimbursed by the Physician Services Account and the Hospital Services Account based on actual administrative costs to develop or adopt the fee schedule required by paragraph (1), not to exceed 10 percent of the amount of the account.

(4) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this subdivision by means of provider bulletins, or similar
 instruction, without taking formal regulatory action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 483, Sec. 53.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

16955.

Reimbursement for losses incurred by any physician shall be limited to services provided to a patient as established by subdivisions (f) and (g) of Section 16952, and where all of the following conditions have been met:

(a) The physician has inquired if there is a responsible third-party source of payment.

(b) The physician has billed for payment of services.

(c) Either
 of the following:

(1) A period of not less than three months has passed from the date the physician billed the patient or responsible third party, during which time the physician has made reasonable efforts to obtain reimbursement and has not received reimbursement for any portion of the amount billed.

(2) The physician has received actual notification from the patient or responsible third party that no payment will be made for the services rendered by the physician.

(d) The physician has stopped any current, and waives any future, collection efforts to obtain reimbursement from the patient, upon receipt of funds from the county physician services account in the county emergency medical services fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 671, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

16955.1.

This article shall not be applied or interpreted so as to prevent a physician from seeking payment from a patient or responsible third-party payor, or arranging a repayment schedule for the costs of services rendered prior to receiving payment under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 51, Sec. 42.   Effective April 18, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

16956.

(a) The administering agency shall establish procedures and time schedules for submission and processing of reimbursement claims submitted by physicians in accordance with this chapter.

(b) Schedules for payment established in accordance with this section shall provide for disbursement of the funds available in the account periodically and at least quarterly, if funds remain available for disbursement, to all physicians who have submitted claims containing accurate and
 complete data for payment by the dates established by the administering agency.

(c) Claims which are not supported by records may be denied by the administering agency, and any reimbursement paid in accordance with this chapter to any physician which is not supported by records shall be repaid to the administering agency, and shall be a claim against the physician.

(d) Any physician who submits any claim for reimbursement under this chapter which is inaccurate or which is not supported by records may be excluded from reimbursement of future claims under this chapter.

(e) A listing of patient names shall accompany a physician’s claim, and those names shall be given full confidentiality protections by the administering agency.

(f) The administering agency
 shall not give preferential treatment to any facility, physician, or category of physician and shall not engage in practices that constitute a conflict of interest by favoring a facility or physician with which the administering officer has an operational or financial relationship.

(g) Payments shall be made only for emergency medical services provided on the calendar day on which emergency medical services are first provided and on the immediately following two calendar days.

(h) Notwithstanding subdivision (g), if it is necessary to transfer the patient to a second facility that provides for a higher level of care for the treatment of the emergency condition, reimbursement shall be available for services provided to the facility to which the patient was transferred on the calendar day of transfer and on the immediately following two calendar days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 671, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

16956.5.

(a) The administering agency may establish an EMS Fund advisory committee. The committee shall include emergency physicians and emergency department oncall backup panel physicians. The committee shall advise the administering agency regarding distribution of funds pursuant to this section.

(b) If the administering agency establishes a committee pursuant to subdivision (a) and the committee, upon an affirmative vote by every member of the committee, recommends that the
 administering agency adopt a special fee schedule and claims submission criteria for reimbursement for services rendered to uninsured trauma patients, the administering agency may adopt the special fee schedule and claims submission criteria.

(c) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in addition to reimbursement for trauma service rendered in the initial day and the following two calendar days, the administering agency may reimburse pursuant to this section for services rendered to uninsured trauma patients beyond the calendar day on which emergency medical services are first provided and the immediately following two calendar days.

(d) Only up to 15 percent of the tobacco tax revenues allocated to the county’s EMS Fund may be distributed through this special fee schedule.

(e) All providers who render
 services to uninsured trauma patients may submit claims for reimbursement under this section. No provider’s claim shall be initially reimbursed pursuant to this section at greater than 50 percent of losses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 671, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

16957.

Any physician who submits any claim in accordance with this chapter shall keep and maintain records of the services rendered, the person to whom services were rendered, and any additional information the administering agency may require, for a period of three years after the services were provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1331, Sec. 9.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

16958.

If, after receiving payment from the account, a physician is reimbursed by a patient or a responsible third-party, the physician shall do one of the following:

(a) Notify the administering agency and the administering agency shall reduce the physician’s future payment of claims from the account . In the event there is not a subsequent submission of a claim for reimbursement within one year, the physician shall reimburse the account in an amount equal to the amount collected from the patient or third-party payor, but not
 more than the amount of reimbursement received from the account.

(b) Notify the administering agency of the payment and reimburse the account in an amount equal to the amount collected from the patient or third-party payor, but not more than the amount of the reimbursement received from the account for that patient’s care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 51, Sec. 43.   Effective April 18, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

16959.

The moneys contained in a Physician Services Account within an Emergency Medical Services Fund shall not be subject to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1797.98a) of Division 2.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1169, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Other County Health Services [16960. - 16961.]

16960.

(a) Twenty-eight and three-tenths percent, or that percentage of the program account deriving from the Unallocated Account of the fund in a fiscal year of each MISP county’s allocation under Section 16941, shall be expended consistent with Article 2 (commencing with Section 30121) of Chapter 2 of Part 13 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, at county discretion, to maintain and enhance health care services provided on or after July 1, 1989, for patients who cannot pay for those services which will not be covered by private insurance or by a program
 funded in whole or in part by the federal government. In those MISP counties where city public health departments exist, the county shall give consideration to those agencies in the use of funds received pursuant to this section.

(b) Counties may expend up to 5 percent or fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), whichever is greater, of the funds received pursuant to this section for costs related to the purchase of equipment and fixed assets. However, no single expenditure may exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 51, Sec. 44.   Effective April 18, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

16961.

Services provided pursuant to this article include only those health care services specified in Sections 14021 and 14132, and former Division 1 (commencing with Section 100), and the Communicable Disease Prevention and Control Act as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 27, of the Health and Safety Code, which are provided to patients who cannot afford to pay for those services, and for whom payment will not be made through private coverage or by any program funded in whole or in part by the federal government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 495.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Child Health and Disability Prevention [16970. - 16970.]

16970.

(a) As a condition of receiving funds under this chapter, a county shall provide, or arrange and pay for, medically necessary followup treatment, including necessary followup dental treatment and prescription drugs, for any condition detected as part of a child health and disability prevention screen for any child eligible for services under Section 104395 of the Health and Safety Code if the child was screened by the county or upon referral by a child health and disability prevention program provider, unless the child is eligible to
 receive care with no share of cost under the Medi-Cal program or is covered under another publicly funded program, or the services are payable under private insurance coverage.

(b) A county may require that hospitals, physicians, dentists, and other providers receiving funds appropriated pursuant to this part participate in complying with this section, provided that:

(1) Hospitals that receive an allocation pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 16946 and physicians who receive payment from the Physician Services Account of the emergency medical services fund established pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 16951) shall not be required to participate in complying with subdivision (a) as a condition of receiving those allocations or payments.

(2) Only providers that contract with the
 county and receive funds disbursed from the Unallocated Account pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 16960) or from the discretionary portion of the Physician Services Account pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 16950, or from the discretionary portion of the Hospital Services Account pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 16946 may be required to participate in complying with subdivision (a).

(c) Dental services provided pursuant to this section shall be at least equal in scope and frequency to dental services available to Medi-Cal eligible children of the same age.

(d) Counties shall implement this section in consultation and coordination with their child health disability prevention programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 496.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. County Application [16980. - 16981.]

16980.

(a) The department shall make initial monthly payments of county allocations made pursuant to Section 16941 upon application of the county assuring that it will comply with the provisions of this part. Payments shall be made on a monthly basis. Payments made beyond February 15 of each fiscal year, shall be contingent upon the signing of an agreement between the county board of supervisors and the department.

(b) (1) Each county shall submit a report of
 expenditures and other information to the department according to procedures established by the department. The department shall review the report submitted pursuant to this paragraph and recoup unspent moneys, or any expenditures that are not in compliance with this chapter or the requirements established pursuant to Section 16990.

(2) Beginning with the 1990–91 fiscal year, each county shall include an estimate of, and the costs and funding arrangement for, dental services in its information submitted pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 195, Sec. 48.   Effective July 12, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

16981.

(a) The department shall conduct fiscal and program reviews to ensure county compliance with the provisions of this part, and shall report annually the results of these reviews to the Legislature. The department may withhold funds, up to the total amount of funds allocated under this chapter, if a county fails to correct deficiencies in the program after receiving written notice of noncompliance from the department.

(b) The department shall recoup funds which were provided
 pursuant to this chapter and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16930) if they were not encumbered or expended according to the requirements of this chapter or Chapter 4 respectively within the fiscal year according to procedures and reports required by the department. The funds shall revert to the CHIP Account or Rural Health Services Account respectively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 195, Sec. 49.   Effective July 12, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Financial Maintenance of Effort [16990. - 16990.9.]

16990.

(a) (1) Any county receiving an allocation pursuant to this chapter and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16930) shall, at a minimum, maintain a level of financial support of county funds for health services at least equal to the total of the amounts specified in this subdivision. The amounts specified in paragraph (1) shall be adjusted on July 1 of each year equal to the growth in the sales tax and vehicle license fees allocated to the trust fund accounts and the county general fund pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing
 with Section 17600) of Part 5.

Each of the following counties shall maintain a realignment financial maintenance of effort according to the following schedule:JurisdictionAmountAlameda $ 62,950,138Alpine 150,781Amador 1,702,152Butte 8,378,036Calaveras 1,286,374Colusa 1,362,787Contra Costa 31,188,063Del Norte 1,305,412El Dorado 5,626,036Fresno 32,555,212Glenn 1,368,045Humboldt 8,995,114Imperial 8,526,220Inyo 2,320,718Kern 23,025,845Kings 4,310,952Lake 1,767,837Lassen 1,555,628Los Angeles 510,082,064Madera 3,523,697Marin 11,349,537Mariposa 766,751Mendocino 2,782,024Merced 4,711,969Modoc 939,453Mono 1,673,165Monterey 11,816,218Napa 4,751,422Nevada 2,669,976Orange 66,846,735Placer 3,009,967Plumas 1,143,704Riverside 33,598,282Sacramento 33,012,993San Benito 1,601,614San Bernardino 27,576,793San Diego 49,373,333San Francisco 106,622,954San Joaquin 12,646,288San Luis Obispo 5,888,487San Mateo 21,788,027Santa Barbara 12,659,559Santa Clara 47,316,403Santa
 Cruz 8,373,710Shasta 6,521,122Sierra 327,339Siskiyou 2,401,825Solano 8,942,768Sonoma 16,146,306Stanislaus 13,403,954Sutter 4,872,252Tehama 3,257,915Trinity 1,599,409Tulare 8,593,714Tuolumne 2,525,076Ventura 17,042,243Yolo 4,396,875Yuba 3,083,423Total $1,278,014,696(2) A county may, upon notifying the department of the transfers authorized by this paragraph, reduce the level of financial maintenance of effort required of the county by paragraph (1) by the amount of the funds transferred from the Health Account pursuant to Section 17600.20.

(b) For purposes of this section, if a county desires to use any of its allocation pursuant to this
 chapter or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16930) for programs and costs not reported as part of the plan and budget required by Section 16800, the county, as a condition of using its allocation for these purposes, must maintain an amount of county funding for those programs and costs at least equal to the 1988–89 fiscal year levels.

(c) Moneys received by a county under this chapter shall be accounted for as revenue in the plan and budget which is required pursuant to Section 16800 and shall not be used as county matching funds for any other program requiring a county match.

(d) If a county fails to maintain financial maintenance of effort at least equal to the total of the amounts specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the department shall recover funds allocated to the county under this part sufficient to bring the county into compliance with the financial
 maintenance of effort provisions. Funds shall be recovered proportionately from the Hospital Services Account, the Physician Services Account, and the Unallocated Account.

(e) The participation fee specified in Section 16809.3 shall not be included in determining a county’s compliance with the maintenance of effort provisions of this section.

(f) For the purposes of determining the level of financial support required for the 1991–92 fiscal year, the amounts specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be reduced to reflect shortfalls in revenue to local health and welfare trust fund health accounts due to shortfalls in receipts of sales tax revenue and county deposits required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 17608.10, compared to the amounts of these funds originally anticipated, as determined by the Director of Health Services.

(g) For the purposes of determining the level of financial support required in the 1992–93 fiscal year, the amounts specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be reduced by 7 percent.

(h) For the purposes of determining the level of financial support required in the 1993–94 fiscal year and subsequent fiscal years, the amounts specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be reduced to reflect shortfalls in revenue to local health and welfare trust fund health accounts due to shortfalls in receipts of sales tax revenue and county deposits required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 17608.10, compared to the amounts of these funds originally anticipated for the 1991–92 fiscal year, as determined by the Director of Health Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 6, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16990.1.

Notwithstanding the first sentence of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 16990, for the purposes of determining the level of financial support in the 1996–97 fiscal year, the amounts specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 16990 shall be added to 50 percent of the amounts specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 199, Sec. 17.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

16990.5.

(a) The following definitions shall govern the construction of this section, unless the context requires otherwise:

(1) “Capital outlay” means net disproportionate share hospital revenues used for projects that involve the acquisition, construction, renovation, improvement, modernization, expansion, or replacement of a plant, building, or fixed or movable equipment, including debt service for facilities used in the provision of county health care services or mental health
 services.

(2) “County health care services” means those services described in subdivision (a) of Section 16801.

(3) “County financial maintenance of effort” means the level of financial support required of a county pursuant to Section 16990.

(4) “Net disproportionate share hospital revenues” means the amount determined by subtracting the total intergovernmental transfers made by a county pursuant to Sections 14163 and 14164 from the total amount of the payment adjustments paid to the county’s hospital or hospitals pursuant to Section 14105.98. This calculation shall reflect any amendment to Sections 14163 and 14164, including amendments to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 14163.

(5) “Mental health services” means those programs transferred or
 otherwise financed pursuant to Chapters 89 and 91 of the Statutes of 1991.

(b) (1) Each county shall deposit all net disproportionate share hospital revenues into a fund or funds other than the county general fund, and shall retain those revenues until utilized for the purposes described in this section.

(2) All disproportionate share hospital revenues are intended to support health care services rendered by disproportionate share hospitals, including, but not limited to, health or mental health services and health or mental health capital outlays. Net disproportionate share hospital revenues shall not be used to supplant or offset county general funds or other funds that were expended or encumbered for those purposes prior to July 1, 1991.

(3) Net disproportionate share hospital revenues shall
 be included in computing county financial maintenance of effort only as set forth in subdivision (c).

(c) For the 1991–92 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, for purposes of computing county financial maintenance of effort, net disproportionate share hospital revenues deposited in accordance with subdivision (b) shall be treated as follows:

(1) Net disproportionate share hospital revenues utilized for a county for mental health services, or for capital outlay for health or mental health services, shall not be counted as revenue in the computation of county financial maintenance of effort.

(2) Net disproportionate share hospital revenues that are not utilized as described in paragraph (1) shall be counted as revenue in the computation of a county’s financial maintenance of effort only to the extent that
 by not counting those revenues for a particular fiscal year, a county’s net county costs for county health care services exceeds the amount of county funds required to satisfy the requirements of Section 16990 for the particular fiscal year.

(3) Net disproportionate share hospital revenues counted as revenue in the calculation of county financial maintenance of effort for a particular year pursuant to paragraph (2) shall not be counted as revenue in the calculation of county financial maintenance of effort relating to any subsequent fiscal year.

(d) Net disproportionate share hospital revenues may not be used for deposits required by Sections 17608.05 and 17608.10 or as county funds required by Section 16990.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 294, Sec. 82.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16990.9.

The level of financial maintenance of effort required of a county that contracts with the department pursuant to Section 101300 of the Health and Safety Code during the 1991–92, 1992–93, 1993–94, 1994–95, and subsequent fiscal years may be reduced by the amount of local public health service funds retained by the county for that fiscal year that are unexpended as a result of vacant contracted positions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 497.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Newly Legalized Person Health Services Appropriation and Funding Guarantee [16991. - 16991.]

16991.

(a) The sum of twenty-six million five hundred ninety-seven thousand dollars ($26,597,000) is appropriated from the General Fund to the department, for the 1989–90 fiscal year, to be allocated to each county receiving funds pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 16703. Each county’s maximum allocation under this section shall be determined as follows: 

(1) The sum of one hundred twenty-six million five hundred ninety-seven thousand dollars ($126,597,000) shall be multiplied by each county’s
 percentage determined by subdivision (d) of Section 16703. 

(2) For each county, the percentage of persons newly legalized under the Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 (IRCA) who are residents of that county divided by the total of all IRCA newly legalized persons for all counties eligible to receive funds pursuant to this section shall be determined. The department shall utilize the most recent data from the federal Department of Health and Human Services for this purpose. 

(3) Each county’s percentage determined in paragraph (2) shall then be multiplied by one hundred twenty-six million five hundred ninety-seven thousand dollars ($126,597,000). 
